Connecticut, session 2026, SB00384.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 4-67o of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
As used in this section and sections 2-79e, 4-67p and 4-67z:
(1) "Data" means the final version of statistical or factual information
that: (A) Is reflected in a list, table, graph, chart or other non-narrative
form that can be digitally or nondigitally transmitted or processed; (B)
is regularly created or maintained by, or on behalf of, an executive
branch agency; and (C) records a measurement, transaction or
determination related to the mission of the agency or is provided to the
agency by third parties pursuant to law.
(2) "Executive branch agency" means any state agency, [listed in
section 4-38c, except the Board of Regents for Higher Education] as
sSB384 / File No. 131 1

sSB384 File No. 131
defined in section 4d-1, except the constituent units of the state system
of higher education and the offices of the Secretary of the State,
Comptroller, Attorney General and Treasurer.
(3) "High value data" means any data that the department head
determines (A) is critical to the operation of an executive branch agency;
(B) can increase executive branch agency accountability and
responsiveness; (C) can improve public knowledge of the executive
branch agency and its operations; (D) can further the core mission of the
executive branch agency; (E) can create economic opportunity; (F) is
frequently requested by the public; (G) responds to a need and demand
as identified by the agency through public consultation; or (H) is used
to satisfy any legislative or other reporting requirements.
(4) "Open data" means any data that (A) is freely available in
convenient and modifiable format and can be retrieved, downloaded,
indexed and searched; (B) is formatted in a manner that allows for
automated machine processing; (C) does not have restrictions
governing use; (D) is published with the finest possible level of detail
that is practicable and permitted by law; and (E) is described in enough
detail so users of the data have sufficient information to understand (i)
the strengths, weaknesses, analytical limitations and security
requirements of the data, and (ii) how to process such data.
(5) "Public data" means any data collected by an executive branch
agency that is permitted to be made available to the public, consistent
with any and all applicable laws, rules, regulations, ordinances,
resolutions, policies or other restrictions, requirements or rights
associated with the data, including, but not limited to, contractual or
other legal restrictions, orders or requirements.
(6) "Protected data" means any data the public disclosure of which
would (A) violate federal or state laws or regulations; (B) endanger the
public health, safety or welfare; (C) hinder the operation of the federal,
state or municipal government, including criminal and civil
investigations; or (D) impose an undue financial, operational or
administrative burden on the executive branch agency. "Protected data"
sSB384 / File No. 131 2

sSB384 File No. 131
includes any records not required to be disclosed pursuant to subsection
(b) of section 1-210.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 4-67o
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
The title was changed.
GAE Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sSB384 / File No. 131 3

sSB384 File No. 131
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill makes various changes to the law governing executive
branch data sharing and management. These changes have no fiscal
impact as it is not anticipated that any additional resources will be
required to implement these changes.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
sSB384 / File No. 131 4

sSB384 File No. 131
OLR Bill Analysis
sSB 384
AN ACT REDEFINING "EXECUTIVE BRANCH AGENCY" FOR
PURPOSES OF DATA GOVERNANCE.